inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_glossing.lexc
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>y%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>w%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>y%>%>am%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>w%>%>am%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>an #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>an%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>am%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>am%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>aan2 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waaw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waao%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>aan2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>agogw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waaw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waao%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>agogw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>agogo%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>agogo%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>aam%>b1aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>inin%>%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>aanh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>ow%>%>ang%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>ang%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>ow%>%>ang%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>ang%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>aan2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>agogw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>egwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>egwaa%>%>weny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>egwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>egwaa%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>agogw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>agogo%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>agogo%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>aam%>b1aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>o%>%>kwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>o%>%>kwaa%>%>weny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>o%>%>kwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>isin%>%>o%>%>kwaa%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>ik%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>ik%>%>waa%>%>w%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>ik%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Thm2b+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>ik%>%>waa%>b1an2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ag%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>ag%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ag%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>ag%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pcp+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>angi%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>angi%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ang%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>ang%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ang%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>ang%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pcp+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>a%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>a%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>a%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>a%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>a%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>egw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>eg%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>egw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>eg%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Pcp+%0+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aany1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aambaany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+1+Prt+Pcp+%0+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aambaany1%>%>ii%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>ogweny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Dub+Pcp+%0+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>ogweny1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Dub+Pcp+3+4:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>ogweny1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>ogobaneny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Prt+Dub+Pcp+%0+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>ogobaneny1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Prt+Dub+Pcp+3+4:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>ogobaneny1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pcp+%0+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aany1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aamb1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Prt+Pcp+%0+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aamb1an2ii%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>sigw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>siigw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>sigw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>igo%>%>siigw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>agw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>ag%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>agw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>ag%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pcp+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>angi%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>angi%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>ang%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>angw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>ang%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>angw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pcp+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>a%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>a%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>a%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@s1%>%>egw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>egw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@s1%>%>egw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>aaw%>%>egw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>ind%>%>waa%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@s1%>%>ind%>%>waa%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@s1%>%>ind%>%>waa%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+3+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@s1%>%>indi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+3:@D.Person@@D.Mode@s1%>%>ind #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Mode@s1%>%>ind%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Del+2+1:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shikan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Del+2+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aakan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Del+2+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aakan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+1:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shiikek #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aakek #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1i%>miinaakek #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shin #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shinaang #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aadaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1i%>miinaadaanik #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2n #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2n #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+1:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shik #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+1+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shinaang #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2k #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2k #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>i2shiken2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aasiidaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aasiidaanig #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+3:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@s1%>%>aaken2 #;
